Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF924.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 724.8, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. Is less than eighteen years of age for a professional permit or less than twenty-one years of age for a nonprofessional permit . Sec. 2. Section 724.15, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 1. It is the intent of this section to satisfy federal requirements of 18 U.S.C. Â§922(t)(3) in order to acquire pistols or revolvers. In order to acquire a pistol or revolver from a federally licensed firearms dealer, an unlicensed person is required to have a valid permit to acquire or a valid permit to carry weapons issued in accordance with this chapter or the person must complete a satisfactory national instant criminal background check pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Â§922(t). A person under the age of twenty-one shall not be issued a permit to acquire a pistol or revolver, nor shall a nonprofessional permit to carry weapons held by a person who has not reached the age of House File 924, p. 2 twenty-one be valid for the transfer of a pistol or revolver from a federally licensed firearms dealer. Sec. 3. Section 724.15, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: a. Under twenty-one eighteen years of age except for those persons included in section 724.22, subsection 4 , who acquire a pistol or revolver when the personâs duty so requires . Sec. 4. Section 724.22, subsections 2, 5, and 8, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2. Except as provided in subsections 4 and 5 , a person who sells, loans, gives, or makes available a pistol or revolver or ammunition for a pistol or revolver to a person below the age of twenty-one eighteen commits a serious misdemeanor for a first offense and a class âDâ felony for second and subsequent offenses. 5. a. A parent , or guardian , or spouse who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, of a person under the age of twenty-one eighteen may allow the person, while under direct supervision, to possess a pistol or revolver or the ammunition therefor for any lawful purpose, or while the person receives instruction in the proper use thereof from an instructor twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, with the consent of such parent, guardian , or spouse. b. As used in this section , âdirect supervisionâ means supervision provided by the parent, guardian, spouse, or instructor who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, who maintains a physical presence near the supervised person conducive to hands-on instruction, who maintains visual and verbal contact at all times with the supervised person, and who is not intoxicated as provided under the conditions set out in section 321J.2, subsection 1 , or under the influence of an illegal drug. 8. A parent, guardian, or spouse , who is twenty-one eighteen years of age or older, of a minor under the age of fourteen years and who allows that minor to possess a pistol or revolver or the ammunition pursuant hereto , shall be strictly liable to an injured party for all damages resulting from the possession of the pistol or revolver or ammunition therefor by that minor. House File 924, p. 3 Sec. 5. Section 724.22, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 924, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor